Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-122
Certified public accountant; certificate;
use of abbreviation C.P.A.; list.

Any person who has been issued a certificate
as a certified public accountant and who holds a permit issued under subdivision
(1)(a) of section 1-136, which is in full force and effect, and any person
who is classified as inactive under section 1-136, shall be styled and known
as a certified public accountant and may also use the abbreviation C.P.A.
The board shall maintain a list of active certified public accountants.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 17, p. 60;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 11.